Louisiana, session 2026, SB447.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. R.S. 33:2491 and 2492(7)(h) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 33:2492(7)(d)(iii) and (i), 2494(C)(8), and 2498(E) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§2491. Establishment and maintenance of employment lists
Except for the positions of entrance firefighter, entrance police officer,
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

ENROLLED
entrance jailer, secretary to the chief, departmental records clerk, and for the entrance
classes for which the operation and maintenance of radio, alarm, or signal systems
for the respective fire or police service is the primary duty, the board shall establish
and maintain employment lists containing the names of persons eligible for
appointment to the various classes of positions in the classified service, as follows:
A. Names The names of regular employees who are demoted from any class
for a reason other than disciplinary action shall be placed upon the reinstatement list
for the class from which they were demoted in the order in which the demotions
were made.
B. Only the names of regular employees who have been laid off in
accordance with the provisions of R.S. 33:2499 shall be eligible for entry upon the
reemployment list. The names of such persons shall be entered upon the
reemployment list for the class from which they were laid off in the order in which
the lay-offs were made.
C. A name placed upon either the reinstatement or the reemployment list
shall remain thereon on the list for a period of four years. The board, however, may
remove the name of any person who refuses an offer of employment following a
certification from either list.
D.(1) Except as provided for in Paragraphs (2), and (3), and (4) of this
Subsection, names of persons attaining a passing score on a promotion test shall be
placed upon the promotion employment list for the class for which they were tested,
from highest to lowest, according to their total departmental seniority. The names of
persons attaining a passing score on a competitive test shall be placed upon the
competitive employment list for the class for which they were tested, from highest
to lowest, according to their final test scores.
(2)(a) Names The names of persons attaining a passing score on the
promotional test in the Lafayette Police Department for the rank of lieutenant or
captain, or in the Lake Charles Police Department, shall be placed upon the
promotion employment list for the class for which they were tested, from highest to
lowest, according to their total promotional seniority in the next lower class. If two
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

ENROLLED
or more persons possess an equal amount of promotional seniority, the names of
those persons shall be placed on the promotional list in the order of departmental
seniority, from highest to lowest.
(b) An employee with the Lake Charles Police Department who is a member
of the armed forces of the United States and is at an official training, active training
exercise, or active duty deployment on the date of a promotional test for which he
is qualified and eligible shall have his name placed upon the promotion employment
list with promotional seniority credit back to the original testing date provided that
the employee takes and attains a passing score on the promotion test upon his return
from training or active duty deployment. In addition, his name shall remain on the
promotional employment list for forty-eight months following his attainment of a
passing score on the promotion test.
(3) Names The names of persons attaining a passing score on the
promotional test in the Crowley Police Department shall be placed on the promotion
employment list for the class for which they were tested, from highest to lowest,
according to their total promotional seniority in the next lower class. If two or more
persons possess an equal amount of promotional seniority, the names of those
persons shall be placed on the promotional list in the order of departmental seniority,
from highest to lowest.
(4) Names of persons attaining a passing score on the promotional test
in the Bossier City Police Department shall be placed on the promotion
employment list for the class for which they were tested, from highest to lowest,
according to their total promotional seniority in the next lower class. If two or
more persons possess an equal amount of promotional seniority, the names of
those persons shall be placed on the promotional list in the order of
departmental seniority, from highest to lowest.
E. Any person whose name is placed upon the competitive employment list
for the entrance or lowest ranking class in the classified service who has served in
the armed forces of the United States of America during the times a time of war, and
has been honorably discharged or discharged under honorable conditions, shall have
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

ENROLLED
added to his final test score a total of five points at the time of placing his name upon
the list. Proof of such service and discharge shall be required by the board or the
state examiner in any manner it deems advisable.
F.(1) The minimum and maximum period of time for which a name may
remain upon a competitive employment list established and maintained by the board
for any of the various classes of positions in the classified fire and police service
shall be twelve and eighteen months, respectively, for each list.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the minimum
and maximum period of time for which a name may remain upon a promotional
employment list established and maintained by the board for any of the various
classes of positions in the classified fire and police service shall be twelve and forty-
eight months, respectively, for each list.
(b) Except as provided in R.S. 33:2491.4(D), the provisions of this Paragraph
shall apply to any promotional employment list that is established and maintained
by the board pursuant to this Part for any of the various classes of positions in the
classified fire and police service containing the names of eligible persons on and
after August 1, 2013.
G. The employment lists for which eligibles are obtained from the results of
tests given for that purpose shall be reestablished in the manner further provided for
by this Part.
H.(1) Except as provided in Paragraphs (2), and (3), and (5) of this
Subsection, when new names are to be placed upon a promotion list for a given class,
the remaining names thereon shall be rearranged with the new names so that all
names appearing upon the list for the class shall rank, from highest to lowest,
according to total departmental seniority.
(2) When new names are to be placed upon a promotion list for a given class
in the Lafayette Police Department for the rank of lieutenant or captain, and in the
Lake Charles Police Department, the remaining names thereon shall be rearranged
with the new names so such that all names appearing upon the list for the class shall
rank, from highest to lowest, according to total promotional seniority in the next
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

ENROLLED
lower class from which the promotion list is established. If two or more persons
possess an equal amount of promotional seniority, the names of those persons shall
be placed on the promotional list in the order of departmental seniority, from highest
to lowest.
(3) When new names are to be placed on a promotion list for a given class in
the Crowley Police Department, the remaining names thereon shall be rearranged
with the new names so such that all names appearing on the list for the class shall
rank, from highest to lowest, according to total promotional seniority in the next
lower class from which the promotion list is established. If two or more persons
possess an equal amount of promotional seniority, the names of those persons shall
be placed on the promotional list in the order of departmental seniority, from highest
to lowest.
(4) When new names are to be placed upon a competitive list for a given
class, the remaining names thereon shall be rearranged with the new names so such
that all names appearing upon the list for the class shall rank, from highest to lowest,
according to their final test scores.
(5) When new names are to be placed on a promotion list for a given
class in the Bossier City Police Department, the remaining names thereon shall
be rearranged with the new names so that all names appearing on the list for the
class shall rank, from highest to lowest, according to total promotional seniority
in the next lower class from which the promotion list is established. If two or
more persons possess an equal amount of promotional seniority, the names of
those persons shall be placed on the promotional list in the order of
departmental seniority, from highest to lowest.
I. For purposes of entrance firefighter, entrance police officer, entrance jailer,
secretary to the chief, departmental records clerk, and for the entrance classes for
which the operation and maintenance of radio, alarm, or signal systems for the
respective fire or police service is the primary duty, the state examiner shall establish
and maintain a statewide eligibility list containing that contains the names of
persons eligible for appointment to these classes by any municipality, parish, or fire
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

ENROLLED
protection district under the municipal fire and police civil service system.
* * *
§2492. Tests
Tests to determine the eligibility of applicants for entry upon the promotional
and competitive employment lists shall be provided as follows:
* * *
(7) Competitive tests shall be held only as the needs of the service require and
shall be given for classes comprising only the following duties or positions:
* * *
(d)(i) * * *
(iii) Notwithstanding Item (i) of this Subparagraph, for the city of
Bossier, operations, management, and supervision of radio, fire alarm, police
alarm, and other signal systems.
* * *
(h) Jail superintendent for the city of Bossier Police Department.
(i) For a position in any class in the classified service after reasonable efforts
by preceding methods provided by this Part have failed to produce names of persons
eligible for regular appointment thereto.
* * *
§2494. Certification and appointment
* * *
C.(1)(a) * * *
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in the
city of Bossier a vacant position in the police department shall be filled in the
following manner:
(a) If a vacancy cannot be filled by reinstatement or by reemployment
as provided in Subsections A and B of this Section, the board shall next certify
the names of the persons on the promotional list, in the order in which they
appear thereon, for the class in which the vacancy is to be filled.
(b) The appointing authority shall select and appoint to the first vacancy
Page 6 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

ENROLLED
to be filled the one person certified to him who has the greatest promotional
seniority in the next lower class. Any remaining positions to be filled in the same
class shall be filled by appointing to each such successive vacancy the one of the
remaining persons certified therefor who has the next highest promotional
seniority in the next lower class.
(c) If any one or more persons so certified should refuse the appointment,
the appointing authority shall then select and appoint one of the persons
certified by the board with the next highest promotional seniority in the next
lower class. This procedure shall be followed until the position has been filled
by appointment of the one person who has the greatest promotional seniority
in the next lower class and who is willing to accept the appointment or until
each person whose name appears on the list, has in this order been certified and
offered an appointment to the vacancy.
(d) If two or more persons possess an equal amount of promotional
seniority, those persons shall be reinstated or listed on the promotional list and
offered promotions in the order of departmental seniority, from highest to
lowest.
* * *
§2498. Abolition of positions in the classified service
* * *
E. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section, if an
entire class in the Bossier City Police Department is abolished in the classified
service, the regular employees of the class shall be demoted to lower classes and
priority to positions shall be governed by total promotional seniority earned in
the class, from highest to lowest. If two or more persons possess an equal
amount of promotional seniority, the names of such persons shall be placed on
the reinstatement list in the order of departmental seniority, from highest to
lowest.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 7 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.